Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 19. Punitive Sections.

§ 33-13-451.
Persons to be tried or punished.

No person may be tried or punished for any offense provided for in Sections 33-13-451 through 33-13-529 of this code, unless it was committed while he was in a duty status or during a period of time when he was under lawful orders to be in a duty status.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-74; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 74; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 73, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-453.
Principal.

Any person subject to this code who:

commits an offense punishable by this code or aids, abets, counsels, commands or procures its commission; or

causes an act to be done which if directly performed by him would be punishable by this code; is a principal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-75; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 75, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-455.
Accessory after the fact.

Any person subject to this code, who knowing that an offense punishable by this code has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent his apprehension, trial, or punishment shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-76; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 76, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-457.
Conviction of lesser included offense.

An accused may be found guilty of an offense necessarily included in the offense charged or of an attempt to commit either the offense charged or an offense necessarily included therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-77; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 77, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-459.
Attempts.

An act, done with specific intent to commit an offense under this code, amounting to more than mere preparation and tending, even though failing, to effect its commission, is an attempt to commit that offense.

Any person subject to this code who attempts to commit any offense punishable by this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed.

Any person subject to this code may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense although it appears on the trial that the offense was consummated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-78; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 78, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-461.
Conspiracy.

Any person subject to this code who conspires with any other person to commit an offense under this code, shall, if one or more of the conspirators does an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-79; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 79, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-463.
Solicitation.

Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another or others to desert in violation of Section 33-13-469 of this code or mutiny in violation of Section 33-13-487 of this code, shall, if the offense solicited or advised is attempted or committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if, the offense solicited or advised is not committed or attempted, he shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another or others to commit an act of misbehavior before the enemy in violation of Section 33-13-497 of this code, or sedition in violation of Section 33-13-487 of this code shall, if the offense solicited or advised is committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed, he shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-80; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 80, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-465.
Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person who:

procures his own enlistment or appointment in the state military forces by knowingly false representations or deliberate concealment as to his qualifications for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

procures his own separation from the state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his eligibility for that separation; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-81; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 81, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-467.
Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person subject to this code who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the state military forces of any person who is known to him to be ineligible for that enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation, or order shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-82; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 82, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-469.
Desertion.

Any member of the state military forces who:

Without authority goes or remains absent from his unit, organization or place of duty with intent to remain away therefrom permanently; or

Quits his unit, organization or place of duty with intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important service; or

Without being regularly separated from one of the state military forces enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another one of the state military forces, or in one of the Armed Forces of the United States or in any foreign armed service without fully disclosing the fact that he has not been regularly separated; is guilty of desertion.

Any commissioned officer of the state military forces who, after tender of his resignation and before notice of its acceptance, quits his post or proper duties without leave and with intent to remain away therefrom permanently is guilty of desertion.

Any person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-83; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 83; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 74, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-471.
Absent without leave.

Any person subject to this code, who without authority:

fails to go to his appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

goes from that place; or

absents himself or remains absent from his unit, organization, or place of duty at which he is required to be at the time prescribed; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-84; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 84, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-473.
Missing movement.

Any person subject to this code who through neglect or design misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which he is required in the course of duty to move shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-85; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 85, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-475.
Contempt towards Governor.

Any commissioned officer subject to this code who uses contemptuous words against the Governor of Mississippi shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-86; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 86; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 75, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-477.
Disrespect toward superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who behaves with disrespect toward his superior commissioned officer shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-87; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 87, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-479.
Assaulting or willfully disobeying superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who:

Strikes his superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against him while that officer is in the execution of his office; or

Willfully disobeys a lawful command of his commissioned officer; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-88; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 88; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 76, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-481.
Insubordinate conduct toward warrant officer or noncommissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who:

Strikes or assaults a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of his office; or

Willfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer; or

Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of his office; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-89; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 89; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 77, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-483.
Failure to obey order or regulation.

Any person subject to this code who:

violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation;

having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the state military forces which it is his duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

is derelict in the performance of his duties; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-90; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 90, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-485.
Cruelty and maltreatment.

Any person subject to this code, who is guilty of cruelty toward, or oppression or maltreatment of, any person subject to his orders shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-91; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 91, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-487.
Mutiny or sedition.

Any person subject to this code who:

with intent to usurp or override lawful military authority refuses, in concert with any other person, or persons, to obey orders or otherwise do his duty or creates any violence or disturbance is guilty of mutiny;

with intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with any other person, revolt, violence, or other disturbances against that authority is guilty of sedition;

fails to do his utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in his presence, or fails to take all reasonable means to inform his superior commissioned officer or commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition which he knows or has reason to believe is taking place; is guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition.

A person who is found guilty of attempted mutiny, mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-92; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 92, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-489.
Resistance, breach of arrest, and escape.

Any person subject to this code who resists apprehension or breaks arrest or who escapes from physical restraint lawfully imposed shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-93; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 93, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-491.
Releasing prisoner without proper authority.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority, releases any prisoner committed to his charge, or who through neglect or design suffers any such prisoner to escape, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with the law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-94; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 94, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-493.
Unlawful detention of another.

Any person subject to this code who, except as provided by law or regulation, apprehends, arrests, or confines any person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-95; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 95, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-495.
Noncompliance with procedural rules.

Any person subject to this code who:

Is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this code; or

Knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or comply with any provision of this code regulating the proceedings before or after trial of an accused; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-96; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 96; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 78, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-497.
Misbehavior before the enemy.

Any person subject to this code who before or in the presence of the enemy:

Runs away;

Shamefully abandons, surrenders or delivers up any command, unit, place or military property which it is his duty to defend;

Through disobedience, neglect or intentional misconduct endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place or military property;

Casts away his arms or ammunition;

Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

Causes false alarms in the command, unit or place under control of the Armed Forces of the United States or the state military forces of Mississippi, or any other state;

Quits his place of duty to plunder or pillage;

Willfully fails to do his utmost to encounter, engage, capture or destroy enemy troops, combatants, vessels, aircraft or any other thing, which it is his duty to so encounter, engage, capture or destroy; or

Does not afford all practicable relief and assistance to any troops, combatants, vessels or aircraft of the Armed Forces belonging to the United States or their allies, to this state, or to any other state, when engaged in battle; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-97; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 97; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 79, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-499.
Subordinate compelling surrender.

Any person subject to this code who compels or attempts to compel the commander of any place, vessel, aircraft or other military property, or of any body of members of the state military forces of this state, or of any other state, to give it up to an enemy or to abandon it, or who strikes the colors or flag to an enemy without proper authority, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-98; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 98; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 80, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-501.
Improper use of countersign.

Any person subject to this code who in time of war discloses the parole or countersign to any person not entitled to receive it, or who gives to another who is entitled to receive and use the parole or countersign a different parole or countersign from that which, to his knowledge, he was authorized and required to give, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-99; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 99, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-503.
Forcing a safeguard.

Any person subject to this code who forces a safeguard shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-100; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 100, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-505.
Captured or abandoned property.

All persons subject to this code shall secure all public property taken from the enemy for the service of the State of Mississippi or the United States, and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority without delay all captured or abandoned property in their possession, custody or control.

Any person subject to this code who:

Fails to carry out the duties prescribed in subsection (1);

Buys, sells, trades or in any way deals in or disposes of captured or abandoned property, whereby he receives or expects any profit, benefit or advantage to himself or another directly or indirectly connected with himself; or

Engages in looting or pillaging; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-101; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 101; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 81, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-507.
Aiding the enemy.

Any person subject to this code who:

aids, or attempts to aid, the enemy with arms, ammunition, supplies, money, or other things; or

without proper authority, knowingly harbors or protects or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with or holds any intercourse with the enemy, either directly or indirectly; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-102; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 102, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-509.
Misconduct of a prisoner.

Any person subject to this code who, while in the hands of the enemy in time of war:

for the purpose of securing favorable treatment by his captors acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to law, custom, or regulation, to the detriment of others of whatever nationality held by the enemy as civilian or military prisoners; or

while in a position of authority over such persons maltreats them without justifiable cause; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-103; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 103, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-511.
False official statements.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to deceive, signs any false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document, knowing it to be false, or makes any other false official statement knowing it to be false, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-104; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 104, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-513.
Military property loss, damage, destruction, wrongful disposition.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority:

sells or otherwise disposes of;

wilfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses; or

wilfully or through neglect suffers to be lost, damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of, any military property of the United States or of the State of Mississippi; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-105; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 105, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-515.
Property other than military property; waste, spoilage, or destruction.

Any person subject to this code who willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils or otherwise willfully and wrongfully destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States or of this state shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-106; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 106; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 82, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-517.
Improper hazarding of vessel.

Any person subject to this code who wilfully and wrongfully hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the Armed Forces of the United States or of the state military forces shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this code who negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the Armed Forces of the United States or of the state military forces shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-107; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 107, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-519.
Under influence of liquor or drugs while on duty; sleeping on post; leaving post before relief.

Any person subject to this code who is found under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any controlled substance listed in the Uniform Controlled Substances Law while on duty or sleeping upon his post, or who leaves his post before he is regularly relieved, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-108; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 108; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 83; Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 33-13-520.
Use, possession, distribution, etc. of controlled substance; controlled substance defined.

Any person subject to this code who uses, while on duty, any controlled substance listed in the Uniform Controlled Substances Law, not legally prescribed, or is found, by a chemical analysis of such person’s blood or urine, to have in his blood, while on duty, any controlled substance described in subsection (3), not legally prescribed, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this code who wrongfully uses, possesses, manufactures, distributes, imports into the customs territory of the United States, exports from the United States, or introduces into an installation, vessel, vehicle or aircraft used by or under the control of the state military forces a substance described in subsection (3) shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

The substances referred to in subsections (1) and (2) are the following:

Opium, heroin, cocaine, amphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, methamphetamine, phencyclidine, barbituric acid, and marijuana and any compound or derivative of any such substance.

Any substance not specified in paragraph (a) that is listed on a schedule of controlled substance prescribed by the President for the purposes of the federal Uniform Code of Military Justice.

Any other substance not specified in paragraph (a) or contained on a list prescribed by the President under paragraph (b) that is listed in Schedules I through V of Section 202 of the federal Controlled Substances Act (21 USCS § 812).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 33-13-521.
Malingering.

Any person subject to this code who for the purpose of avoiding work, duty or service in the state military forces:

Feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse or derangement; or

Intentionally inflicts self-injury; shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-109; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 109; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 84, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-523.
Riot or breach of peace.

Any person subject to this code who causes or participates in any riot or breach of the peace shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-110; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 110; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 85, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-525.
Provoking speeches or gestures.

Any person subject to this code who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures towards any other person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-111; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 111; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 86, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-527.
Conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman.

Any commissioned officer, officer candidate or warrant officer who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-112; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 112; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 87, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-529.
General article.

Though not specifically mentioned in this code, all disorders and neglect to the prejudice of good order and discipline in the state military forces and/or all conduct of a nature to bring discredit upon the state military forces, of which persons subject to this code may be guilty, shall be taken cognizance of by a general or special court-martial according to the nature and degree of the offense and shall be punished at the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-113; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 113; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 88, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§§ 33-13-531 through 33-13-539.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§33-13-531. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-114; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 114]

§33-13-533. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-115; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 115]

§33-13-535. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-116; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 116]

§33-13-537. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-117; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 117]

§33-13-539. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-118; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 118]